Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 5. Local Disaster Emergency Grant and Loan Fund
[Repealed].

§§ 43-41-501 and 43-41-503.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 336, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§43-41-501. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 1]

§43-41-503. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 2]

§ 43-41-505.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 405, § 14 eff July 1, 2004.

§43-41-505. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 210; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 65, eff from and after July 1, 1989.]

§§ 43-41-507 through 43-41-515.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 336, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§43-41-507. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 4]

§43-41-509. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 5]

§43-41-511. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 6]

§43-41-513. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 7]

§43-41-515. [Laws, 1980, ch. 435, § 8]